Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 7. Commercial Passenger Vessel Environmental Compliance Program.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.460.
Program established.

There is established the commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program providing for

terms and conditions of vessel discharges;

independent verification of environmental compliance; and

allowing the department to monitor and supervise discharges from commercial passenger vessels through a registration system.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

. The department shall use negotiated regulation making under AS

44.62.710

—

44.62.800

, when appropriate, to develop those regulations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.461.
Registration requirements.

Except as provided in AS

46.03.487

, each calendar year in which the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel intends to operate, or cause or allow to be operated, the vessel in the marine waters of the state, the owner or operator of the vessel shall register with the department. The registration shall be completed before the time any commercial passenger vessel of the owner or operator enters the marine waters of the state in that calendar year. The registration must include the following information:

the vessel owner’s business name and, if different, the vessel operator’s business name for each commercial passenger vessel of the owner or operator that is scheduled to be in the marine waters of the state during the calendar year;

the postal address, electronic mail address, telephone number, and facsimile number for the principal place of each business identified under (1) of this subsection;

the name and address of an agent for service of process for each business identified under (1) of this subsection; the owner and operator shall continuously maintain a designated agent for service of process whenever a commercial passenger vessel of the owner or operator is in the marine waters of the state, and the agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation having a place of business in and authorized to do business in this state;

the name or call sign of and Port of Registry for each of the owner’s or operator’s vessels that is scheduled either to call upon a port in this state or otherwise to be in the marine waters of the state during the calendar year and after the date of registration; and

an agreement to comply with the terms and conditions of vessel discharges specified under AS

46.03.462

.

Registration under (a) of this section shall be executed under oath by the owner or operator.

Upon request of the department, the registrant shall submit registration information required under this section electronically.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.462.
Terms and conditions of discharge permits.

An owner or operator may not discharge any treated sewage, graywater, or other wastewater from a commercial passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state unless the owner or operator

obtains a permit under AS

46.03.100

that complies with the terms and conditions of vessel discharge requirements specified in (b) of this section; or

has a plan approved under (k) of this section.

The minimum standard terms and conditions for all discharge permits authorized under (a)(1) of this section require that the owner or operator

may not discharge untreated sewage, treated sewage, graywater, or other wastewaters in a manner that violates any applicable state or federal law governing the disposal or discharge of solid or liquid waste material;

shall maintain records and provide the reports required under AS

46.03.465(a)

;

shall collect and test samples as required under AS

46.03.465(b)

and (d) and provide the reports with respect to those samples required by AS

46.03.475(c)

;

shall report discharges in accordance with AS

46.03.475(a)

;

shall allow the department access to the vessel at the time samples are taken under AS

46.03.465

for purposes of taking the samples or for purposes of verifying the integrity of the sampling process; and

shall submit records, notices, and reports to the department in accordance with AS

46.03.475(b)

, (d), and (e).

[Repealed, §§ 2, 9, and 13, ch. 56, SLA 2007]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 1 SLA 2013.]

When issuing, reissuing, renewing, or modifying a permit required under (a)(1) of this section, the department may only include the authorization of a mixing zone for a commercial passenger vessel that employs an advanced wastewater treatment system that falls within the class of systems identified by the department under (j) of this section or employs other means of pollution prevention, control, and treatment that the department finds can achieve a quality of effluent that is comparable to that of one or more vessels employing an advanced wastewater treatment system. If a commercial passenger vessel employs an advanced wastewater treatment system that satisfies the requirements of this subsection, the department shall find the commercial passenger vessel satisfies all state technology-based treatment requirements for authorization of a mixing zone.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 1 SLA 2013.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 1 SLA 2013.]

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to

restrict the areas in which discharges permitted under this section may occur; or

impose additional terms and conditions on the manner in which discharges permitted under this section may be made in a specific area.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the department may administratively extend until December 15, 2015, the duration of the general permit that was issued in 2010 under AS

46.03.100

to regulate wastewater discharges from commercial passenger vessels. The department may modify the terms of the administratively extended general permit following the process provided for by law for modifying other permits issued by the department under AS

46.03.100

.

In this section, the department shall determine the systems that constitute the class of advanced wastewater treatment systems that may be approved by permit under (e) of this section considering factors deemed appropriate by the department. At a minimum, the department’s determination must find

that the system provides treatment of sewage and graywater on board commercial passenger vessels that achieves levels of biological treatment, solids removal, and disinfection higher than that achieved by traditional marine sanitation devices required by 33 C.F.R. 159; and

that effluent discharged from that system meets all requirements under P.L. 106-554, 33 U.S.C. 1901 note.

The owner or operator of a small commercial passenger vessel may submit a plan for alternative terms and conditions of vessel discharges. The alternative terms and conditions may include alternatives to the requirements under AS

46.03.465(a)

- (d). The department shall approve the plan for a five-year period if the department finds that the alternative terms and conditions in the plan incorporate the best management practices for protecting the environment to the maximum extent feasible. The department shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection but may not require an owner or operator to retrofit a vessel solely for the purpose of waste treatment if the retrofitting requires additional stability testing or relicensing by the United States Coast Guard. In this subsection, “best management practices” means schedules of activities, prohibitions of practices, maintenance procedures, and other management practices to prevent or reduce the pollution of the marine waters of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am §§ 2, 4, 6 ch 153 SLA 2004; am § 4, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§ 1, 3 ch 56 SLA 2007; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 53 SLA 2009; am §§ 1 — 5 ch 1 SLA 2013; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 21 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in subsection (b), “this section” was substituted for “this provision” to conform 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2 to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

In 2009, in (b)(3), “to” was inserted after “respect” to correct a manifest error.

Subsection (d) was repealed effective March 1, 2013 under secs. 5 and 7, ch. 1, SLA 2013, making redundant the delayed repeal on January 1, 2016, of subsection (d) by sec. 9, ch. 56, SLA 2007.

The delayed amendment of (b) by sec. 3, ch. 53, SLA 2009, and the delayed repeal of (e) and (f) under secs. 7 and 8, ch. 53, SLA 2009, which were to take effect December 31, 2015, were repealed by sec. 6, ch. 1, SLA 2013.

In 2016, in the first sentence of (e), “(a)” was substituted for “(a)(1)” to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2009 amendments of this section, see § 1, ch. 53, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 10, 2009, in (b)(1) added “, except as provided in (e) of this section” at the end; added (e), (f), (g), and (h). These amendments are repealed effective December 31, 2015.

The 2013 amendment, effective March 1, 2013, in (b)(1), substituted “state or federal law governing the disposal or discharge of solid or liquid waste material” for “effluent limits or standards under state or federal law, including Alaska water quality standards governing pollution at the point of discharge, except as provided in (e) of this section”; in (c), deleted “if the keel of the vessel was laid before January 1, 2004” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “The department shall approve the plan for a five-year period” for “Except as provided in (d) of this section, the department shall approve the plan for a three-year period” at the beginning of the third sentence; repealed (d); rewrote (e), which provided for a three-year reduced standard for effluent in certain circumstances; repealed (f) and (g); and added (i) and (j).

The 2017 amendment, effective August 11, 2017, added (a)(2), and made related and stylistic changes; in (b), inserted “(a)(1) of” following “authorized under”; in (e), substituted “under (a)(1)” for “under (a)” following “required under”; added (k).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 amendment of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

The 2006 amendment did not address the delayed amendments in ch. 153, SLA 2004 that were to take effect January 1, 2016. Those 2004 delayed amendments were repealed in §§ 10 and 12, ch. 56, SLA 2007.

Sec. 46.03.463.
Prohibited discharges; limitations on discharges.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, a person may not discharge untreated sewage from a commercial passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state.

Except as provided in (h) of this section or under a plan for a small commercial passenger vessel approved under AS

46.03.462(k)

, a person may not discharge sewage from a commercial passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state that has suspended solids greater than 150 milligrams per liter or a fecal coliform count greater than 200 colonies per 100 milliliters except that the department may by regulation adopt a protocol for retesting for fecal coliform, if this discharge limit for fecal coliform is exceeded, under which a discharger will be considered to be in compliance with the fecal coliform limit if the geometric mean of fecal coliform count in the samples considered under the protocol does not exceed 200 colonies per 100 milliliters.

Except as provided in (h) of this section or under a plan for a small commercial passenger vessel approved under AS

46.03.462(k)

, a person may not discharge graywater or other wastewater from a commercial passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state that has suspended solids greater than 150 milligrams per liter or a fecal coliform count greater than 200 colonies per 100 milliliters except that the department may by regulation adopt a protocol for retesting for fecal coliform, if this discharge limit for fecal coliform is exceeded, under which a discharger will be considered to be in compliance with the fecal coliform limit if the geometric mean of fecal coliform count in the samples considered under the protocol does not exceed 200 colonies per 100 milliliters.

[Repealed, § 5, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2.]

An owner or operator may not discharge any treated sewage, graywater, or other wastewater from a large commercial passenger vessel into the marine waters of the state unless the owner or operator obtains a permit under AS

46.03.100

and

46.03.462

, and provided that the vessel is not in an area where the discharge of treated sewage, graywater, or other wastewaters is otherwise prohibited.

Except as provided in (h) of this section, a person may not discharge sewage from a small commercial passenger vessel unless the sewage has been processed through a properly operated and properly maintained marine sanitation device.

[Repealed, § 5, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2.]

The provisions of (a) — (f) of this section do not apply to discharges made for the purpose of securing the safety of the commercial passenger vessel or saving life at sea if all reasonable precautions have been taken for the purpose of preventing or minimizing the discharge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am §§ 7, 9, 12 ch 153 SLA 2004; am § 5, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§ 4, 6 ch 56 SLA 2007; am §§ 5, 6 ch 21 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective August 11, 2017, In (b) and (c), inserted “or under a plan for a small commercial passenger vessel approved under AS

46.03.462(k)

” following “(h) of this section”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 amendment of (e) of this section and repealed (d) and (g) of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

The 2006 amendment did not address the delayed amendments to this section in ch. 153, SLA 2004 that were to take effect January 1, 2016.
Those 2004 delayed amendments were repealed in §§ 10 and 12, ch. 56, SLA 2007.

Sec. 46.03.464.
Advisory panel on wastewater treatment; commissioner’s reports to the legislature. [Repealed, § 5 ch 1 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 46.03.465.
Information-gathering requirements; exemption.

The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel shall maintain daily records related to the period of operation while in the state, detailing the dates, times, and locations, and the volumes and flow rates of any discharges of sewage, graywater, or other wastewaters into the marine waters of the state, and provide electronic copies of those records on a monthly basis to the department not later than five days after each calendar month of operation in state waters.

While a commercial passenger vessel is present in the marine waters of the state, the owner or operator of the vessel shall provide an hourly report of the vessel’s location based on Global Positioning System technology and collect routine samples of the vessel’s treated sewage, graywater, and other wastewaters being discharged into marine waters of the state with a sampling technique approved by the department.

While a commercial passenger vessel is present in the marine waters of the state, the department, or an independent contractor retained by the department, may collect additional samples of the vessel’s treated sewage, graywater, and other wastewaters being discharged into the marine waters of the state.

The owner or operator of a vessel required to collect samples under (b) of this section shall ensure that all sampling techniques and frequency of sampling events are approved by the department in a manner sufficient to ensure demonstration of compliance with all discharge requirements under AS

46.03.462

.

The owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel shall pay for all reporting, sampling, and testing of samples under this section.

If the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel has, when complying with another state or federal law that requires substantially equivalent information gathering, gathered the information required under (a), (b), or (d) of this section, the owner or operator shall be considered to be in compliance with that subsection so long as the information is also provided to the department.

[Repealed, § 9, ch. 56, SLA 2007]

On request, the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel discharging wastewater under AS

46.03.462(b)

shall provide the department with information relating to wastewater treatment, pollution avoidance, and pollution reduction measures used on the vessel, including testing and evaluation procedures and economic and technical feasibility analyses.

The department may exempt from the requirements of (a) — (d) of this section the owner or operator of a small commercial passenger vessel who has a plan for alternative terms and conditions of vessel discharges approved under AS

46.03.462(k)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am § 6, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 8 ch 56 SLA 2007; am §§ 50, 51 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 53 SLA 2009; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 10, 2009, added (h).

The 2017 amendment, effective August 11, 2017, added (i).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 amendment of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Sec. 46.03.470.
Record keeping requirements.

An owner or operator subject to AS

46.03.465

shall record the information required to be gathered under that section and shall maintain the records for three years after the date the information was gathered.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.475.
Reporting requirements.

An owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel who becomes aware of a discharge in violation of AS

46.03.463

shall immediately report that discharge to the department. There is no audit report privilege under AS

09.25.450

for this information.

If the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel operating in the marine waters of the state is required by the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency or the secretary of the federal department in which the United States Coast Guard is operating to collect samples and test sewage, graywater, or other wastewater and keep records of the sampling and testing, the owner or operator shall, within 21 days after the sewage, graywater, or other wastewater is tested, submit to the department a copy of the records.

Within 21 days after the testing required under AS

46.03.465(d)

, the owner or operator shall submit a written report to the department that contains the measurements required under AS

46.03.465(d)

and describes the sampling technique and analytical testing methods used. The information in the report required under this subsection may be provided by referring to, and including copies of, other reports that are required by substantially equivalent state or federal reporting requirements.

If the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel operating in the marine waters of the state is required by the laws of the United States or by the laws of Canada or of a province or territory of Canada to file a report or provide notice of a discharge or offloading of a hazardous waste, as defined in AS

46.03.900

, or of a hazardous substance, as defined in AS

46.03.826

, that was generated, discharged, or offloaded while the vessel was operating in the marine waters of the state, the owner or operator shall submit to the department a copy of the report or notice within 21 days after having provided the report or notice to an agency of the government of the United States or to an agency of the government of Canada or of a province or territory of Canada.

Before the operation of a commercial passenger vessel in the marine waters of the state, the owner or operator of the vessel shall provide to the department a plan that describes the vessel’s policies and procedures for

offloading in this state or disposing into the marine waters of the state of nonhazardous solid waste other than sewage; and

offloading of hazardous waste or a hazardous substance from the vessel while it is operating in the marine waters of the state to the extent that the offloading is not covered by (d) of this section.

Upon request of the department, the information required under this section shall be submitted electronically.

This section does not relieve the owner or operator of a commercial passenger vessel from other applicable reporting requirements of state or federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.476.
Ocean rangers.

An owner or operator of a large commercial passenger vessel entering the marine waters of the state is required to have an ocean ranger hired or retained by the department on board the vessel to act as an independent observer for the purpose of monitoring state and federal requirements pertaining to marine discharge and pollution requirements and to insure that passengers, crew, and residents at ports are protected from improper sanitation, health, and safety practices.

The ocean ranger shall monitor, observe, and record data and information related to the engineering, sanitation, and health related operations of the vessel, including but not limited to registration, reporting, record-keeping, and discharge functions required by state and federal law.

Any information recorded or gathered by the ocean ranger shall be promptly conveyed to the Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation and the United States Coast Guard on a form or in a manner approved by the commissioner of environmental conservation. The commissioner may share information gathered with other state and federal agencies.

In this section, “ocean ranger” means

a marine engineer licensed by the United States Coast Guard; or

a person who holds a degree in marine safety and environmental protection, or an equivalent course of study approved by the department, from an accredited maritime educational institution.

History.

(§ 7, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§ 1, 2 ch 20 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective May 22, 2009, substituted “ocean ranger” for “licensed marine engineer” or similar throughout the section; added subsection (d); and made related stylistic changes.

Effective dates. —

Enacted by 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2 as approved by the voters at the primary election of August 22, 2006. The results of the primary election were certified by the director of the division of elections September 18, 2006. Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions take effect December 17, 2006.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Sec. 46.03.480.
Fees.

There is imposed an environmental compliance fee on each commercial passenger vessel operating in the marine waters of the state.

The fee imposed by (a) of this section for all commercial passenger vessels, other than vessels operated by the state, is a separate fee for each voyage during which the commercial passenger vessel operates in the marine waters of the state. The fee shall range from $.70 to $1.75 per berth, based on the overnight accommodation capacity of the vessel, determined with reference to the number of lower berths, according to the following categories:

$75 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 50 but not more than 99 passengers for hire;

$175 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 100 but not more than 249 passengers for hire;

$375 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 250 but not more than 499 passengers for hire;

$750 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 500 but not more than 999 passengers for hire;

$1,250 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 1,000 but not more than 1,499 passengers for hire;

$1,750 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 1,500 but not more than 1,999 passengers for hire;

$2,250 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 2,000 but not more than 2,499 passengers for hire;

$2,750 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 2,500 but not more than 2,999 passengers for hire;

$3,250 for a commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for at least 3,000 but not more than 3,499 passengers for hire;

$3,750 for each commercial passenger vessel with overnight accommodations for 3,500 or more passengers for hire.

The fee imposed by (a) of this section for a commercial passenger vessel that is operated by this state shall be determined by agreement between the commissioner of environmental conservation and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

An additional fee in the amount of $4 per berth is imposed on all large commercial passenger vessels, other than vessels operated by the state, for the purpose of operating the Ocean Ranger program established in AS

46.03.476

; said program shall be subject to legislative appropriation.

A commercial passenger vessel operating in the marine waters of the state is liable for the fee imposed by this section. The fee is due and payable to the department in the manner and at the times required by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am § 8, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, subsection (d) of this section was relettered as subsection (e) under an instruction given in § 8, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 addition of (d) of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Sec. 46.03.481.
Citizens’ suits.

Any citizen of the State of Alaska may commence a civil action (1) against an owner or operator of a large passenger vessel alleged to have violated any provision of this chapter, or (2) against the department where there is an alleged failure to perform any act or duty under this chapter which is not discretionary. No civil action may be commenced under this section, however, prior to 45 days after the plaintiff has provided written notice of the intent to sue to the Attorney General of Alaska.

Subject to appropriation, as necessary, up to 50 percent and not less than 25 percent of any fines, penalties, or other funds recovered as a result of enforcement of this chapter shall be paid to the person or entity, other than the defendant, providing information sufficient to commence an investigation and enforcement of this chapter under this provision.

History.

(§ 7, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Sec. 46.03.482.
Commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance fund.

The commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance fund is created in the general fund.

The fund consists of the following, all of which shall be deposited in the fund upon receipt:

money received by the department in payment of fees under AS

46.03.480

;

money received under AS

46.03.760(e)

as a result of a violation related to AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

unless the money would otherwise be deposited in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund established by AS

46.08.010

;

money appropriated to the fund by the legislature;

earnings on the fund.

The legislature may make appropriations from the fund to the department to pay for the department’s operational costs necessary to prepare reports that assess the information received by the department for the cruise ship seasons of 2000, 2001, 2002, and 2003 and for the department’s operational costs necessary to carry out activities under AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

relating to commercial passenger vessels.

The unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation made from the fund to the department for the purposes described in (c) of this section lapses into the fund on December 31 following the end of the period for which the appropriation was made.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.485.
Recognition program.

The department may engage in efforts to encourage and recognize superior environmental protection efforts made by the owners or operators of commercial passenger vessels that exceed the requirements established by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.487.
Exemption for vessels in innocent passage.

AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

do not apply to a commercial passenger vessel that operates in the marine waters of the state solely in innocent passage. For purposes of this section, a vessel is engaged in innocent passage if its operation in marine waters of the state, regardless of whether the vessel is a United States or foreign-flag vessel, would constitute innocent passage under the

Convention on the Territorial Sea and the Contiguous Zone, April 29, 1958, 15 U.S.T. 1606; or

United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea 1982, December 10, 1982, United Nations Publication No. E.83.V.5, 21 I.L.M. 1261 (1982), were the vessel a foreign-flag vessel.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.488.
Activities of the department.

The department may engage in the following activities relating to commercial passenger vessels operating in the marine waters of the state:

direct in-water monitoring of discharges or releases of sewage, graywater, and other wastewater and direct monitoring of the opacity of air emissions from those vessels;

monitoring and studying of direct or indirect environmental effects of those vessels; and

researching ways to reduce effects of the vessels on marine waters and other coastal resources.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.

Sec. 46.03.490.
Definitions.

In AS

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

,

“agent for service of process” means an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the owner or operator may be served;

“commercial passenger vessel” means a vessel that carries passengers for hire except that “commercial passenger vessel” does not include a vessel

authorized to carry fewer than 50 passengers;

that does not provide overnight accommodations for at least 50 passengers for hire, determined with reference to the number of lower berths; or

operated by the United States or a foreign government;

“discharge” means any release, however caused, from a commercial passenger vessel, and includes any escape, disposal, spilling, leaking, pumping, emitting, or emptying;

“federal cruise ship legislation” means secs. 1401 — 1414 of H.R. 5666, as incorporated by reference into P.L. 106-554;

“fund” means the commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance fund established under AS

46.03.482

;

“graywater” means galley, dishwasher, bath, and laundry waste water;

“large commercial passenger vessel” means a commercial passenger vessel that provides overnight accommodations for 250 or more passengers for hire, determined with reference to the number of lower berths;

“marine waters of the state” means all waters within the boundaries of the state together with all of the waters of the Alexander Archipelago even if not within the boundaries of the state;

“offloading” means the removal of a hazardous substance, hazardous waste, or nonhazardous solid waste from a commercial passenger vessel onto or into a controlled storage, processing, or disposal facility or treatment works;

“other wastewater” means graywater or sewage that is stored in or transferred to a ballast tank or other holding area on the vessel that may not be customarily used for storing graywater or sewage;

“passengers for hire” means vessel passengers for whom consideration is contributed as a condition of carriage on the vessel, whether directly or indirectly flowing to the owner, charterer, operator, agent, or any other person having an interest in the vessel;

“sewage” means human body wastes and the wastes from toilets and other receptacles intended to receive or retain human body waste;

“small commercial passenger vessel” means a commercial passenger vessel that provides overnight accommodations for 249 or fewer passengers for hire, determined with reference to the number of lower berths;

“treated sewage” means sewage that meets all applicable effluent limitation standards and processing requirements of 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1376 (Federal Water Pollution Control Act), as amended, the federal cruise ship legislation, and regulations adopted under 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1376 or under the federal cruise ship legislation;

“untreated sewage” means sewage that is not treated sewage;

“vessel” means any form or manner of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, whether or not capable of self-propulsion;

“voyage” means a vessel trip to or from one or more ports of call in the state with the majority of the passengers for hire completing the entire vessel trip; a vessel trip involving stops at more than one port of call is considered a single voyage so long as the majority of passengers for hire complete the entire trip;

“waters of the Alexander Archipelago” means all waters under the sovereignty of the United States within or near Southeast Alaska, beginning at a point 58 degrees 11 minutes 41 seconds North, 136 degrees 39 minutes 25 seconds West (near Cape Spencer Light), thence southeasterly along a line three nautical miles seaward of the baseline from which the breadth of the territorial sea is measured in the Pacific Ocean and the Dixon Entrance, except where this line intersects geodesics connecting the following five pairs of points: (A) 58 degrees 05 minutes 17 seconds North, 136 degrees 33 minutes 49 seconds West and 58 degrees 11 minutes 41 seconds North, 136 degrees 39 minutes 25 seconds West (Cross Sound); (B) 56 degrees 09 minutes 40 seconds North, 134 degrees 40 minutes 00 seconds West and 55 degrees 49 minutes 15 seconds North, 134 degrees 17 minutes 40 seconds West (Chatham Strait); (C) 55 degrees 49 minutes 15 seconds North, 134 degrees 17 minutes 40 seconds West and 55 degrees 50 minutes 30 seconds North, 133 degrees 54 minutes 15 seconds West (Sumner Strait); (D) 54 degrees 41 minutes 30 seconds North, 132 degrees 01 minutes 00 seconds West and 54 degrees 51 minutes 30 seconds North, 131 degrees 20 minutes 45 seconds West (Clarence Strait); (E) 54 degrees 51 minutes 30 seconds North, 131 degrees 20 minutes 45 seconds West and 54 degrees 46 minutes 15 seconds North, 130 degrees 52 minutes 00 seconds West (Revillagigedo Channel); the portion of each such geodesic situated beyond three nautical miles from the baseline from which the breadth of the territorial sea is measured forms the outer limit of the waters of the Alexander Archipelago in those five locations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 FSSLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial passenger vessel environmental compliance program, see 18 AAC 69.